Illinois, session 104th, SB3011.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prohibition of Nicotine Sales Near Schools Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Day care center" has the meaning given to that term in 8Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. "Day care center" 9does not include day care homes, as defined by Section 2.18 of 10the Child Care Act of 1969, or group day care homes, as defined 11in Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969.12    "Near" means within 1,000 feet as measured by a straight 13line from the nearest point of the property line of the parcel 14on which the school or day care center is located to the 15nearest point of the property line of the parcel on which the 16retailer is located.17    "Nicotine-containing products" means any product 18containing any form of the chemical nicotine, including any 19salt or complex, regardless of whether the chemical is 20naturally or synthetically derived, and includes nicotine 21alkaloids and nicotine analogs and any substance that mimics 22or replicates the pharmacological effect of nicotine.23    "School" means any (i) elementary or secondary educational   SB3011- 2 -LRB104 19382 RTM 32830 b1institution; (ii) charter school; (iii) vocational school; 2(iv) special education facility; (v) elementary or secondary 3educational agency, as defined in Section 10 of the P-20 4Longitudinal Education Dara System Act; or (vi) nonpublic 5school, including any nonprofit, non-home-based, and nonpublic 6elementary or secondary school. 7    Section 10. Municipal and county duties.8    (a) By January 1, 2027, every municipality shall regulate, 9within its territorial limits, the retail sale of 10nicotine-containing products near schools and day care 11centers.12    (b) By January 1, 2027, every county shall regulate, 13within its territorial limits but outside of the territorial 14limits of any municipality, the retail sale of 15nicotine-containing products near schools and day care 16centers.17    (c) If a county or municipality does not comply with this 18Section by January 1, 2027, then the retail sale of 19nicotine-containing products near schools and day care centers 20within that county or municipality shall be governed by 21Section 15.22    (d) Municipalities and counties may enact more restrictive 23provisions than the provisions set forth in this Act. 24    Section 15. Regulation by the Department of Revenue. After   SB3011- 3 -LRB104 19382 RTM 32830 b1January 1, 2027, the Department of Revenue may not grant 2licenses for retailers that would permit the retail sale of 3nicotine-containing products near a school or day care center 4in (i) any municipality that has failed to comply with 5subsection (a) of Section 10 by January 1, 2027 and (ii) any 6territory within the limits of a county that has failed to 7comply with subsection (b) of Section 10. Notwithstanding this 8Section, any establishment in existence before January 1, 2027 9shall be able to keep or renew its retailer license that 10permits the establishment to sell nicotine containing products 11if the principal of the school or owner of the day care center 12located near the establishment has not indicated opposition to 13the issuance or renewal of the license in writing to the 14Department of Revenue. 15    Section 20. Home rule. A home rule county or home rule 16municipality may not regulate the retail sale of 17nicotine-containing products near a school or day care center 18in a manner less restrictive than the requirements of this 19Act. This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule 20powers and functions under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 21Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.